Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-231
Proof in lieu of acknowledgment; by handwriting; when authorized.

If all the subscribing witnesses shall be dead, or out of the state, such death or absence is first to be proved, and then the execution of the deed may be proved before such officer by proving the handwriting of the grantor and of any subscribing witness to such deed.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 10, p. 282;

R.S.1913, § 6206;

C.S.1922, § 5605;

C.S.1929, § 76-211;

R.S.1943, § 76-231.